Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1195.
do enact as follows:AB1195,11Section 1. 20.640 of the statutes is created to read:AB1195,2,3220.640 Civil legal aid board. There is appropriated to the civil legal aid 3board for the following programs:AB1195,2,54(1) Legal assistance. (a) General program operations. A sum sufficient for 5the operation of the office of civil legal aid.AB1195,2,86(b) Program implementation. A sum sufficient for implementing the right to 7appointment of counsel under ch. 759, including promoting and advertising the 8program.AB1195,21Section 2. 20.923 (4) (f) 2g. of the statutes is created to read:AB1195,3,2220.923 (4) (f) 2g. Civil legal aid board: director of civil legal aid.AB1195,33Section 3. 230.08 (2) (qm) of the statutes are created to read:AB1195,3,44230.08 (2) (qm) The director of civil legal aid.AB1195,45Section 4. 704.145 of the statutes is created to read:AB1195,3,86704.145 Notices of right to counsel in eviction actions. (1) A residential 7rental agreement shall include the following notice in the agreement or in an 8addendum to the agreement:AB1195,3,99NOTICE OF RIGHT TO COUNSEL IN EVICTION ACTIONSAB1195,3,2010As provided under s. 799.425 of the Wisconsin Statutes, in an action against a 11tenant whose residential tenancy has been terminated for any reason, the tenant 12shall have a right to counsel at public expense and, once referred to the director of 13civil legal aid, the director may appoint counsel for the tenant under s. 759.05 of the 14Wisconsin Statutes, unless the tenant knowingly and voluntarily waives the right 15to counsel. A tenant who wants counsel appointed in an eviction action must 16appear on the date specified in the summons or request that counsel be appointed 17by contacting the clerk of court of the county in which the residential eviction action 18has been brought on or before the return date specified in the summons. A tenant 19is advised that this notice is only a summary of the tenant’s rights and the specific 20language of the statutes governs in all instances.AB1195,3,2221(2) A landlord providing notice under ss. 704.16, 704.17, and 704.19 shall 22include in the notice the following information:AB1195,3,2323RIGHT TO COUNSEL IN EVICTION ACTIONSAB1195,4,111As provided under s. 799.425 of the Wisconsin Statutes, in an action against a 2tenant whose residential tenancy has been terminated for any reason, the tenant 3shall have a right to counsel at public expense and, once referred to the director of 4civil legal aid, the director may appoint counsel for the tenant under s. 759.05 of the 5Wisconsin Statutes, unless the tenant knowingly and voluntarily waives the right 6to counsel. A tenant who wants counsel appointed in an eviction action must 7appear on the date specified in the summons or request that counsel be appointed 8by contacting the clerk of court of the county in which the residential eviction action 9has been brought on or before the return date specified in the summons. A tenant 10is advised that this notice is only a summary of the tenant’s rights and the specific 11language of the statutes governs in all instances.AB1195,512Section 5. 704.17 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1195,4,1613704.17 (4) Form of notice and manner of giving. Notice must be in writing 14and given as specified in s. 704.21. If so given, and unless ordered otherwise by a 15court in an eviction action under ch. 799, the tenant is not entitled to possession or 16occupancy of the premises after the date of termination specified in the notice.AB1195,617Section 6. 758.10 of the statutes is created to read:AB1195,4,2418758.10 Civil legal aid board. (1) Selection of members. There is created 19a civil legal aid board consisting of 9 members appointed by the supreme court. The 20members shall be appointed for staggered 3-year terms. No member may be, or be 21employed on the staff of, a judicial officer, district attorney, corporation counsel, or 22the office of civil legal aid, and no member may have an ownership interest in 23residential property that the member makes available for rent or lease to tenants. 24At least 5 members shall be members of the State Bar of Wisconsin.AB1195,5,21(2) Term expiration. The terms of members expire on May 1. Members shall 2hold office until their successors have been selected.AB1195,5,53(3) Selection of officers. At its first meeting in each year, the board shall 4elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, and secretary, each of whom may be reelected 5for successive terms.AB1195,5,106(4) Frequency of meetings. The board shall meet quarterly and may meet 7at other times on the call of the chairperson or a majority of its members. In 8addition, the board shall meet no later than August 31 of each even-numbered year 9to consider and approve a proposed budget of the office of civil legal aid for the 10succeeding fiscal biennium.AB1195,5,1411(5) Quorum. A majority of the membership of the board constitutes a 12quorum to do business and, unless a more restrictive provision is adopted by the 13board, a majority of a quorum may act in any matter within the jurisdiction of the 14board.AB1195,5,1815(6) Reimbursement for expenses; compensation. The members of the 16board shall be reimbursed from the appropriation under s. 20.640 (1) (a) for their 17actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The 18members shall receive no compensation for their services.AB1195,719Section 7. Chapter 759 of the statutes is created to read:AB1195,5,2120CHAPTER 75921OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AIDAB1195,5,2222759.01 Definitions. In this chapter:AB1195,5,2323(1) “Board” means the civil legal aid board.AB1195,6,21(2) “Director” means the director of civil legal aid appointed under s. 759.03 2(1).AB1195,6,43759.02 Civil legal aid board. (1) Duties. The board shall do all of the 4following:AB1195,6,55(a) Appoint the director and establish the director’s salary under s. 20.923.AB1195,6,86(b) Evaluate the director’s proposed biennial budget of the office of civil legal 7aid and, after the budget is approved by the board, submit the budget to the 8supreme court.AB1195,6,109(d) Establish guidelines for evaluating attorney conflicts of interest when 10appointing counsel under s. 759.05 (1).AB1195,6,1311(e) Establish a process for an attorney to appeal the director’s decision 12regarding bill payments, as provided under s. 759.05 (3). The board may affirm, 13modify, or reject a decision of the director.AB1195,6,1514(f) Establish a process for an attorney to appeal the director’s decision to 15exclude the attorney from a list prepared under s. 759.06.AB1195,6,1916(g) Enter into agreements with the State Bar of Wisconsin, local bar 17associations, law firms, right-to-counsel programs, and private counsel designed to 18encourage legal representation under this chapter without compensation as a 19service to the state.AB1195,6,2120(h) Perform all other duties necessary and incidental to the performance of 21any duty enumerated in this chapter.AB1195,6,2222(2) Powers. The board may do any of the following:AB1195,6,2323(a) Remove the director under s. 759.03 (2).AB1195,7,224(b) Enter into contracts with federal governmental agencies, right-to-counsel 1programs, and local public defender organizations for the provision of legal services 2under this chapter.AB1195,7,43(c) Make recommendations to the supreme court and the legislature regarding 4the provision of civil legal aid under this chapter.AB1195,7,75(3) Restrictions. The board may not make any decision regarding the 6handling of any case nor interfere with the director or any member of the director’s 7staff in carrying out professional duties. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1195 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1195 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1195 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1195 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1195: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting